engvvc.lexc
!!!engvvc.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +VVC +PRES +Modal

LEXICON Root

VVC ;

LEXICON VVC

could[stem]+VVC+PRES+Modal:could've #;
may[stem]+VVC+PRES+Modal:may've #;
might[stem]+VVC+PRES+Modal:might've #;
must[stem]+VVC+PRES+Modal:must've #;
should[stem]+VVC+PRES+Modal:should've #;
would[stem]+VVC+PRES+Modal:would've #;
